Tennessee, session 114, HB0558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 10, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) It is an offense for a person who is in the United States without legal
authorization to operate a motor vehicle without possessing:
(1) A valid driver license as required under § 55-50-301; and
(2) Evidence of financial responsibility as required under § 55-12-139.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor, with a maximum fine
of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0558
002109
- 1 -